Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2034.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Buprenorphine.
Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for at least one type of buprenorphine for each
form of administration. There shall be no copayment required and no deductible shall need to be
met by the contract, plan, or policy, every twelve (12) month plan year. A deductible may be applied
to health plans that are paired with a federally qualified health savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C
§ 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan from implementing this benefit prior to
January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Buprenorphine.
Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for at least one type of buprenorphine for each
form of administration. There shall be no copayment required and no deductible shall need to be
met by the contract, plan, or policy, every twelve (12) month plan year. A deductible may be applied

to health plans that are paired with a federally qualified health savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C
§ 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan from implementing this benefit prior to
January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Buprenorphine.
Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for at least one type of buprenorphine for each
form of administration. There shall be no copayment required and no deductible shall need to be
met by the contract, plan, or policy, every twelve (12) month plan year. A deductible may be applied
to health plans that are paired with a federally qualified health savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C
§ 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan from implementing this benefit prior to
January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-101. Buprenorphine.
Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for at least one type of buprenorphine for each
form of administration. There shall be no copayment required and no deductible shall need to be
met by the contract, plan, or policy, every twelve (12) month plan year. A deductible may be applied
to health plans that are paired with a federally qualified health savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C
§ 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan from implementing this benefit prior to
January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003363
========
LC003363 - Page 2 of 3